Maine, session 132, LD2083.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §42, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 237, §1, is further
amended to read:
1-A. Administration of medication. The administration of medication in assisted
housing programs, residential care facilities, drug treatment centers, day care facilities,
children's homes and nursery schools and nonnursing level intermediate care facilities for
persons with intellectual disabilities must be in accordance with rules established by the
department. In other facilities licensed or approved by the department, excluding those
facilities licensed under section 1811, other than nonnursing level intermediate care
facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities, the department may establish rules for
the administration of medication as it considers necessary. In establishing rules for each
type of facility, the department shall consider, among other factors, the general health of
the persons likely to receive medication, the number of persons served by the facility and
the number of persons employed at the facility who might be involved in the administration
of medication. Any rules for the administration of medication must be established in
accordance with Title 5, chapter 375.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §42, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Certified residential medication aide certificate. The department shall issue a
certificate to an individual who has successfully completed a department-approved
certified residential medication aide course that meets the medication administration
training requirements for unlicensed assistive personnel under Title 32, section 2102,
subsection 11 in accordance with rules established by the department for facilities under
subsection 1-A. The course must be designed to ensure competency in the safe
administration of medications by individuals who are not licensed health care
professionals. The department shall review the course curriculum at least once every 5
years, or more frequently as determined necessary by the commissioner, to ensure
alignment with current clinical standards, safety practices and the needs of residents and
clients in facilities under subsection 1-A. The department shall develop rules for the
certification of certified residential medication aides and certified residential medication
Page 1 - 132LR2796(03)

aide instructors and may establish and collect reasonable certification fees and sanction
fees from individuals as well as from instructors. Fees must be set by rule and may range
from $25 to $100 per individual or instructor, per course. A certificate issued pursuant to
this subsection is valid for a 2-year certification period. Fees collected pursuant to this
section must be deposited in a dedicated special revenue account to support certified
residential medication aide certification activities and the ongoing oversight and
maintenance of the curriculum. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Division of Licensing and Certification Z036
Initiative: Establishes one Program Services II position to oversee the Department's
Certified Residential Medication Aide (CRMA) certificate program and includes all other
funding for a contract position to address clinical issues in the training and testing process
and work with the Board of Nurses to improve training quality and CRMA competency.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $180,366
All Other $0 $91,950
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $0 $272,316
Page 2 - 132LR2796(03)